Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.110

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a license, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 302 s 12.]